SpellChecking/Dictionaries/gikuyu.aff
FLAG num
PFX 121 a tũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e tũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e tũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i tũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i tũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ tũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ tũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o tũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o tũguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u tũku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u tũgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 ũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 ũgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a ũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a ũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e ũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e ũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i ũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i ũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o ũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o ũguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u ũku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u ũgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 mũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 mũgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a mũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a mũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e mũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e mũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i mũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i mũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ mũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ mũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o mũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o mũguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u mũku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u mũgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 akũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 agũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a akwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a agwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e akwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e agwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i akũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i agũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ akwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ agwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o akuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o aguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u aku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u agu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 makũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 magũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a makwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a magwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e makwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e magwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i makũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i magũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ makwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ magwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o makuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o maguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u maku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u magu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 ĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 ĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a ĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a ĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e ĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e ĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i ĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i ĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o ĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o ĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u ĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u ĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 rĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 rĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a rĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a rĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e rĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e rĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i rĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i rĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o rĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o rĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u rĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u rĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 gĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 gĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a gĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a gĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e gĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e gĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i gĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i gĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o gĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o gĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u gĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u gĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 cikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 cigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a cikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a cigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e cikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e cigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i cikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i cigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ cikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ cigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o cikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o ciguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u ciku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u cigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 ikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 igũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a ikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a igwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e ikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e igwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i ikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i igũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ igwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o ikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o iguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u iku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u igu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 rũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 rũgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a rũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a rũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e rũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e rũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i rũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i rũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o rũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o rũguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u rũku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u rũgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 gakũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 gagũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a gakwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a gagwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e gakwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e gagwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i gakũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i gagũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gakwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gagwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o gakuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o gaguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u gaku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u gagu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 gũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 gũgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a gũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a gũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e gũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e gũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i gũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i gũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o gũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o gũguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u gũku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u gũgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 hakũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 hagũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a hakwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a hagwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e hakwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e hagwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i hakũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i hagũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ hakwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ hagwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o hakuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o haguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u haku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u hagu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 ndikũ [bghmnr] 
PFX 121 a ndikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a ndikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 o ndikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 ũ ndikũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 121 0 ndigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a ndigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 a ndigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o ndiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 ũ ndigũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 121 0 tũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 tũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a tũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a tũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e tũtikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e tũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i tũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i tũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ tũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ tũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o tũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o tũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u tũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u tũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 ndũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 ndũgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a ndũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a ndũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e ndũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e ndũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i ndũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i ndũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o ndũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o ndũguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u ndũku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u ndũgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 mũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 mũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a mũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a mũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e mũtikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e mũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i mũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i mũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ mũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ mũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o mũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o mũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u mũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u mũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 ndakũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 ndagũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a ndakwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a ndagwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e ndakwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e ndagwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i ndakũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i ndagũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndakwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndagwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o ndakuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o ndaguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u ndaku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u ndagu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 matikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 matigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a matikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a matigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e matikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e matigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i matikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i matigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ matikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ matigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o matikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o matiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u matiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u matigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 ndĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 ndĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a ndĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a ndĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e ndĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e ndĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i ndĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i ndĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ ndĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o ndĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o ndĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u ndĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u ndĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 rĩtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 rĩtigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a rĩtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a rĩtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e rĩtikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e rĩtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i rĩtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i rĩtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rĩtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rĩtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o rĩtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o rĩtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u rĩtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u rĩtigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 gĩtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 gĩtigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a gĩtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a gĩtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e gĩtikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e gĩtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i gĩtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i gĩtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gĩtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gĩtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o gĩtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o gĩtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u gĩtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u gĩtigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 citikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 citigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a citikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a citigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e citikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e citigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i citikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i citigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ citikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ citigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o citikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o citiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u citiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u citigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 itikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 itigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a itikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a itigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e itikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e itigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i itikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i itigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ itikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ itigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o itikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o itiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u itiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u itigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 rũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 rũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a rũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a rũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e rũtikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e rũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i rũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i rũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ rũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o rũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o rũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u rũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u rũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 gatikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 gatigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a gatikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a gatigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e gatikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e gatigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i gatikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i gatigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gatikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gatigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o gatikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o gatiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u gatiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u gatigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 gũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 gũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a gũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a gũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e gũtikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e gũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i gũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i gũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ gũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o gũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o gũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u gũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u gũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 121 0 hatikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 121 0 hatigũ [ckt]
PFX 121 a hatikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 121 a hatigwa a[ckt]
PFX 121 e hatikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 121 e hatigwe e[ckt]
PFX 121 i hatikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 121 i hatigũi i[ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ hatikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 121 ĩ hatigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 121 o hatikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 121 o hatiguo o[ckt]
PFX 121 u hatiku u[^ckt]
PFX 121 u hatigu u[ckt]

SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 -inĩ .


#Aspectual/Modal Suffixes, All verbs
SFX 480 Y 5
SFX 480 a aga [^i]a 
SFX 480 ia agia ia
SFX 480 wo agwo wo
SFX 480 a ire [^i]a
SFX 480 ia arie ia

#Aspectual/Modal Suffixes, Voiced Consonants
SFX 481 Y 3
SFX 481 a ĩĩte
SFX 481 ia ĩĩtie ia
SFX 481 wo ĩĩtwo wo

#Aspectual/Modal Suffixes, Voiced Consonants
SFX 482 Y 3
SFX 482 a ete [^i]a
SFX 482 ia etie ia
SFX 482 wo etwo wo

#Deverbal Extensions, All Verbs
SFX 450 Y 30
SFX 450 a anga [^i]a
SFX 450 a angwo [^i]a
SFX 450 wo angwo wo
SFX 450 ia angia ia
SFX 450 ia angio ia
SFX 450 a ana [^i]a
SFX 450 a anwo [^i]a
SFX 450 ia ania ia
SFX 450 ia anio ia
SFX 450 wo anwo wo
SFX 450 a ithia [^i]a
SFX 450 a ithio [^i]a
SFX 450 wo ithio wo
SFX 450 ia ithia ia
SFX 450 ia ithio ia
SFX 450 a ania [^i]a
SFX 450 ia ania ia
SFX 450 a anio [^i]a
SFX 450 ia anio ia
SFX 450 wo anio wo
SFX 450 a wo [^i]a
SFX 450 ia o ia
SFX 450 a anĩra [^i]a
SFX 450 a anĩrwo [^i]a
SFX 450 ia anĩria ia
SFX 450 ia anĩrio ia
SFX 450 a anĩria [^i]a
SFX 450 a anĩrio [^i]a
SFX 450 wo anĩrio wo
SFX 450 a ia [^i]a

# Deverbal Extensions, Verbs beginning with Voiced Consonants
SFX 451 Y 12
SFX 451 a ĩka [^i]a
SFX 451 ia ĩka ia
SFX 451 a ĩra [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrwo [^i]a
SFX 451 ia ĩria ia
SFX 451 ia ĩrio ia
SFX 451 a ĩria [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrio [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrĩra [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrĩrwo [^i]a
SFX 451 ia ĩrĩria ia
SFX 451 ia ĩrĩrio ia

# Deverbal Extensions, Verbs beginning with Voiceless Consonants
SFX 452 Y 12
SFX 452 a eka [^i]a
SFX 452 ia eka ia
SFX 452 a era [^i]a
SFX 452 a erwo [^i]a
SFX 452 ia eria ia
SFX 452 ia erio ia
SFX 452 a eria [^i]a
SFX 452 a erio [^i]a
SFX 452 a erera [^i]a
SFX 452 a ererwo [^i]a
SFX 452 ia ereria ia
SFX 452 ia ererio ia
